vinfl.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

!POS

!Infl
%<Rflx%>
%<Rcpr%>
%<Caus%>
%<Psv%>
%<Abil%>
%<Pol%:Pos%>
%<Pol%:Neg%>
%<Prbl%>
!Tense
%<Tns%:Imp%>
%<Tns%:Opt%>
%<Tns%:Cond%>
%<Tns%:Past%>
%<Tns%:Iprf%>
%<Tns%:Necc%>
%<Tns%:Fut%>
%<Tns%:Evid%>
%<Tns%:Pres%>
%<Tns%:Aor%>
%<Tns%:Narr%>
!Person
%<Prsn%:1s%>
%<Prsn%:1p%>
%<Prsn%:2s%>
%<Prsn%:2p%>
%<Prsn%:3s%>
%<Prsn%:3p%>
!Copula
%<Cpl%:Past%>
%<Cpl%:Aor%>
%<Cpl%:Cond%>
%<Cpl%:Narr%>
!Question
%<Q%>
!SpecialChars
%(%{I%}%)
%{A%}
%(%{A%}%)
%{I%}
%(y%)
%{Q%}
%{n%}
%{N%}
%{s%}
%{D%}
%{SPC%}

LEXICON VC1_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC1;

LEXICON VC1

%<Caus%>:%-d%{I%}r CausA ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC2_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC2;

LEXICON VC2

%<Caus%>:%-d%{I%}r CausA ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Psv ;
: VR ;


LEXICON VC3_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC3;

LEXICON VC3

%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)%{D%} CausB ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC4_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC4;

LEXICON VC4

%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)%{D%} CausB ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC5_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC5;

LEXICON VC5

%<Caus%>:%-%{I%}r CausA ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC6_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC6;

LEXICON VC6

%<Caus%>:%-%{I%}r CausA ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC7_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC7;

LEXICON VC7

%<Caus%>:%-%{A%}r CausA ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC8_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC8;

LEXICON VC8

%<Caus%>:%-%{A%}r CausA ;
%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC9_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC9;

LEXICON VC9

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)l Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC10_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC10;

LEXICON VC10

%<Psv%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n Psv ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC11_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC11;

LEXICON VC11

%<Caus%>:%-d%{I%}r CausA ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC12_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC12;

LEXICON VC12

%<Caus%>:%-%(%{I%}%)%{D%} CausB ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC13_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC13;

LEXICON VC13

%<Caus%>:%-%{I%}r CausA ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC14_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC14;

LEXICON VC14

%<Caus%>:%-%{A%}r CausA ;
: VR ;

LEXICON VC15_CAT

%<VERB%>: VC15;

LEXICON VC15

%: VR ;

LEXICON VR

%<Rflx%>:%-%(%{I%}%)n RaR ;
%<Rcpr%>:%-%(%{I%}%)ş RaR ;
APP ;


LEXICON RaR

%<Caus%>:%-d%{I%}r CausA ;
%<Psv%>:%-%{I%}l Psv ;
APP ;


LEXICON CausA

%<Psv%>:%-%{I%}l Psv ;
APP ;
%<Caus%>:%-%{D%} CausB ;

LEXICON CausB

%<Psv%>:%-%{I%}l Psv ;
APP ;
%<Caus%>:%-t%{I%}r CausA ;


LEXICON Psv

APP ;

LEXICON APP

%<Abil%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}%{SPC%}bil Abil+ ;
%<Abil%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}n Abil- ;
%<Abil%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}%{SPC%}bilen Abil- ;
%<Pol%:Pos%>:%- Pol3 ;
%<Pol%:Neg%>:%-m%(%{A%}%) Pol2 ;

LEXICON Abil+

%<Pol%:Pos%>:%- Pol1 ;
%<Pol%:Neg%>:%-m%(%{A%}%) Pol2 ;

LEXICON Abil-

%<Pol%:Neg%>:%-m%(%{A%}%) Pol2 ;

LEXICON Pol1

TAMP1 ;
TAMP3 ;

LEXICON Pol2

%<Prbl%>:%-y%{A%}bil Prbl ;
TAMP1 ;
TAMP2 ;

LEXICON Pol3
TAMP1 ;
TAMP3 ;
%<Prbl%>:%-y%{A%}bil Prbl ;

LEXICON Prbl

TAMP1 ;
TAMP3 ;

LEXICON TAMP3

%<Tns%:Aor%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}r T5;
TAMP3Deriv ;

LEXICON TAMP2

%<Tns%:Aor%>:%-%r T9;
%<Tns%:Aor%>:%-z T10;
TAMP2Deriv ;

LEXICON T9

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%{A%}m P2 ;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{I%}%{Q%} P2 ;

LEXICON T10

%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P2 ;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P2 ;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P2 ;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P2 ;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş C6 ;


LEXICON TAMP1

%<Tns%:Imp%>:%- T1 ;
%<Tns%:Opt%>:%-%(y%)%{A%} T2;
%<Tns%:Cond%>:%-s%{A%} T3;
%<Tns%:Evid%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}b T4;
%<Tns%:Pres%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}r T5;
%<Tns%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş T5;
%<Tns%:Past%>:%-d%{I%} T6;
%<Tns%:Necc%>:%-m%{A%}l%{I%} T7;
%<Tns%:Iprf%>:%-m%{A%}%{Q%}d%{A%} T7;
%<Tns%:Fut%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}c%{A%}%{Q%} T8;
TAMP1Deriv ;


LEXICON T1

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}m P4;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}q P4;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%- P4;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}n P4;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%-s%{I%}n P4;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-s%{I%}nl%{A%}r P4;

LEXICON P4

#;

LEXICON T2

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-q P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;

LEXICON T3
%<Cpl%:Past%>:%-yd%{I%} C1;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-ym%{I%}ş C2;
%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-q P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;

LEXICON C1

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-q P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;

LEXICON C2

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%{A%}m P1;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P1;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P1;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{I%}%{Q%} P1;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P1;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P1;

LEXICON T4
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-d%{I%}r C4;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş C5;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P2;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P2;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P2;

LEXICON C4

%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P3;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;

LEXICON C5

%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P3;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P3;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P3;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;

LEXICON P2

%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q;
# ;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-s%{A%} C7;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş C3;
%<AsIf%>:%-c%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;

LEXICON C7

# ;

LEXICON C3

# ;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-s%{A%} C7;

LEXICON T5

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%{A%}m P2;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P2;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P2;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{I%}%{Q%} P2;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P2;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P2;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş C6;



LEXICON P3

%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q;
# ;
%<Cpl%:Cond%>:%-s%{A%} C7;
%<AsIf%>:%-c%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;

LEXICON T6

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-m P3;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-n P3;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P3;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{Q%} P3;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-n%{I%}z P3;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;

LEXICON T7

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%(y%)%{A%}m P3;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P3;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%(y%)%{I%}%{Q%} P3;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P3;
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-d%{I%}r C4;
%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-ym%{I%}ş C6;

LEXICON C6

%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%{A%}m P3;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P3;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P3;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{I%}%{Q%} P3;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P3;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;



LEXICON T8

%<Cpl%:Narr%>:%-m%{I%}ş C6;
%<Cpl%:Aor%>:%-d%{I%}r C4;
%<Prsn%:1s%>:%-%{A%}m P3;
%<Prsn%:2s%>:%-s%{A%}n P3;
%<Prsn%:3s%>:%- P3;
%<Prsn%:1p%>:%-%{I%}%{Q%} P3;
%<Prsn%:2p%>:%-s%{I%}n%{I%}z P3;
%<Prsn%:3p%>:%-l%{A%}r P3;




LEXICON P1

%<Q%>:%-%{SPC%}m%{I%} Q;
%<AsIf%>:%-c%{A%}s%{I%}n%{A%} Adv_CAT;
# ;

LEXICON Q

#;
